Rhode Island, session 2025, SB957.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 8-4.1-1, 8-4.1-2 and 8-4.1-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 8-4.1
entitled "Court Clerks’ Incentive Pay" are hereby amended to read as follows:
8-4.1-1. Incentive pay plan.
There is hereby established an incentive pay program in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter offering financial compensation to clerks of the supreme, superior, family, and district,
courts and administrators of the workers’ compensation court, and the traffic tribunal for furthering
their education in the field of court administration or law enforcement. This incentive program shall
apply to all clerks who hold this position on July 5, 1994, and shall not apply to any person hired
as a clerk after July 5, 1994 meet the eligibility requirements set forth in §8-4.1-2.
8-4.1-2. Eligibility for plan.
(a) Any full time clerk of the supreme, superior, family, or district court or administrators
of the workers’ compensation court, and the traffic tribunal covered by a collective bargaining
agreement in existence on July 5, 1994 and providing for the incentive pay plan under this chapter
shall be eligible for the plan established by this chapter provided he or she: the person acquires
(1) Has, on or before July 5, 1994, acquired the requisite degree as set forth in § 8-4.1-3;
or.
(2) Has, on or before July 5, 1994, accumulated at least fifty percent (50%) of the credits
necessary to receive either degree as set forth in § 8-4.1-3 and thereafter receives that degree; or

(3) Is, on July 5, 1994, enrolled in a degree program, completion of which will entitle him
or her to either degree as set forth in § 8-4.1-3, and thereafter receives that degree.
(b) The clerk, within thirty (30) days after July 5, 1994, must submit to the court
administrator a certified copy of a transcript from a college or university as evidence of such credits.
Provided, however, notwithstanding any general or public law to the contrary, incentive payments
shall not be continued to any person in the future when the person no longer holds a clerk position
as set forth in this section. Additionally, no clerk hired after July 5, 1994, shall be eligible to receive
incentive payments under the provisions of this chapter.
8-4.1-7. Effective date.
Sections 8-4.1-1 — 8-4.1-3 Section 8-4.1-1 shall not take effect for any existing court
clerks or administrators presently receiving an incentive pay under this chapter until the expiration
of any collective bargaining agreement in existence on July 5, 1994 upon passage. However, upon
the expiration of the collective bargaining agreement which is in effect at the time of July 5, 1994,
§§ 8-4.1-1 — 8-4.1-3 shall apply to all existing clerks receiving an incentive under this chapter.
SECTION 2. Section 8-4.1-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 8-4.1 entitled "Court Clerks’
Incentive Pay" is hereby repealed.
8-4.1-6. Additional credit for masters degree.
Any other provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, every full time clerk
of the supreme, superior, family, or district court who earns the degree of master in public
administration shall be paid, in addition to basic salary and any other credit to which he or she is
entitled hereunder, the additional sum of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) each year.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002648
========
LC002648 - Page 2 of 3